Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 10. Earthslide Relief Act.

Sec. 09.45.800.
Prerequisite earthslide changing land boundaries.

If the boundaries of land, owned either by public or by private persons have been moved by an act of God, consisting of an earthslide, so that they are in a location different from that at which, by solar survey, they were located before the earthslide, an action in rem to recognize the boundaries as they presently exist and to quiet title within the boundaries in the persons judicially found entitled to title under AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

, is authorized, maintainable by the persons and with the procedures in AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

for the handling of the emergencies dealt with in AS 09.45.800 — 09.45.880.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Cross references. —

For purpose of AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

, see § 1, ch. 80, SLA 1966 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 80, SLA 1966, see 1966 Supplemental Journal No. 17, p. 1.

Sec. 09.45.805.
Parties.

An action authorized by AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

may be commenced by

a borough with the joinder of a city or cities included in the borough;

a city not included within the boundaries of a borough, if the earthslide has affected land in the city, or land outside the city as to which outside land the city has statutory power to approve a land map;

a school district that has statutory power to approve a land map; or

any other entity or person, granted permission by the court to bring the action.

In an action authorized by AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

every person in actual and peaceable possession of, or having an estate or interest in any of the land affected by the action, whose possession or evidence of estate or interest is either recorded or known to the plaintiffs, must be designated in the complaint of the action, and given notice in the manner required by AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

and the court rules of civil procedure.

All unknown parties, including owners, claimants, heirs, devisees, legatees, or assigns, may be described in the caption and complaint as “all persons claiming any interest in or lien upon, the real property herein described or any part of it.”

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.810.
Separate actions as to separate slide areas.

An entity that is a permissible plaintiff under AS

09.45.805

, may, in its discretion, bring a separate action under AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

with respect to each separate slide area located within its boundaries and its decision regarding the desirability of the separate action, and regarding the area to be dealt with in each action is final.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.815.
Complaint.

The complaint must substantially include

a statement of the facts making the provisions in AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

applicable;

a description of the entire real property sought to be affected by the action;

a specification of the estate, title, and interest owned, and in the actual possession of the plaintiff or plaintiffs in described parts of the entire real property sought to be affected by the action;

a specification of the estate, title, and interest, so far as they are known to the plaintiffs or either of them, and so far as they are capable of being discovered by reasonably diligent search by the plaintiff or plaintiffs, in each separate part of the entire real property sought to be affected by the action;

a specification of the street areas offered by the plaintiff, or plaintiffs, to be vacated in whole or in part for judicial equitable allocation to landowners for the mitigation of the losses inflicted upon the landowners by the act of God consisting of the earthslide;

a proposed replatting of the entire real property sought to be affected by the action, embodying the land boundaries as fixed by the act of God, except as these have been liberalized by judicially directed use of the vacated lands.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.820.
Publication and posting of notice.

The notice required by Rule 4(e)(4), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure shall be published as provided in the rules, and a copy of the notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place on each separate parcel of the entire real property described in the complaint within 20 days after the first publication of the notice.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, substituted “Rule 4(e)(4), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure” for “Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 4(e)(4)”, made a stylistic change.

Sec. 09.45.825.
Procedure applicable.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

, the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to actions authorized by AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Sec. 09.45.830.
Jurisdiction.

Upon the completion of the service, publication and posting of the summons, as may be required by AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

and the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, the court has complete jurisdiction over the parties plaintiff or plaintiffs and the entire real property described in the complaint as intended to be affected by the action and over the person of everyone having or claiming an estate, right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, all or any part of the property and shall be considered to have obtained the possession and control of the property for the purposes of the action with complete jurisdiction to render the judgment provided for in AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Sec. 09.45.835.
Answer.

An answer to the complaint must be served within 90 days after the first publication of the notice, or such further time not exceeding 30 days, as the court for good cause may grant.

An answer must

specifically set out the particulars in which the claimant’s estate, right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon all or any part of the property is different from, or greater than, the interest of the claimant as it is described in the complaint;

be confined to rights based on events occurring at the time of, or since the time of the act of God, consisting of the earthslide.

To whatever extent, if at all, the answering party has rights against anyone whatsoever, based upon facts or events that occurred before the earthslide, the claims shall remain unaffected by the action brought under AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

and shall be assertable subsequent to the conclusion of the action at any time and in any manner permitted by law, notwithstanding the judgment granted in this action, recognizing however the finality of this judgment as to the consequences, with respect to land boundaries, of the earthslide.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.840.
Lis pendens.

A party to an action authorized by AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

may record a notice of the pendency of the action in the form and at the place and with the effects specified in AS

09.45.940

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988. In 1994, “AS

09.45.940

” was substituted for “AS 09.45.790” to reflect the 1994 renumbering of that section.

Sec. 09.45.845.
Vacating of streets in whole or in part.

The vacating of streets in whole or in part by the voluntary action of a municipality, for the purpose of making it possible for the court to mitigate the hardships suffered by individuals because of the change in land boundaries caused by the act of God, consisting of an earthslide, can be accomplished by the offer of the municipality expressed in the complaint followed by the court’s approval of it in the action authorized in AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

, without other formalities.
This provision is a special emergency substitute for the provisions contained in AS

29.40.120

—

29.40.160

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966; am § 38 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 22 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 09.45.850.
Proof of facts.

In an action of the type authorized in AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

, judgment may not be given by default, but the court must require proof of the facts alleged in the complaint and other pleadings.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.855.
Scope of judgment.

The judgment shall

determine the land boundaries of each parcel of land located within the entire area of real property sought to be affected by the action, whether owned publicly or privately after judicial equitable allocation of lands voluntarily vacated by a municipality under AS

09.45.845

;

determine the person or persons having estates, rights, titles, interests, and claims in and to each parcel, whether legal or equitable, present or future, vested or contingent, or whether they consist of mortgages or liens of any description;

approve and direct the proper filing of a new plat map covering the entire area of real property sought to be affected by the action, as a substitute for the plat maps previously filed, but rendered inaccurate by the act of God, consisting of an earthslide.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.860.
Standards for judgment.

In reaching the conclusions called for by AS

09.45.855

the court shall give effect to the changes in land boundaries caused by the earthslide, mitigated, however, so far as can equitably be done, by allocating to contiguous lots parts of the land released by a municipality by its voluntary vacation of areas formerly constituting public ways, which vacatings of streets shall be approved in this judgment.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.865.
Effect of judgment.

The judgment shall be conclusive with respect to land boundaries upon every person who at the commencement of the action had or claimed an estate, right, title, or interest in or to a part of the entire area of real property described in the complaint as intended to be affected by this action, and upon every person claiming under any such person by title subsequent to the commencement of the action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.870.
Recording of judgment.

A certified copy of the judgment shall be recorded, at the expense of the plaintiff or plaintiffs in the action, in the office of the recorder of the recording district in which the affected land is situated.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.875.
Cumulative remedies.

The remedies provided for by AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

are cumulative and in addition to any other remedy provided by law for quieting or establishing title to real property or the boundaries of it.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.45.880.
Short title.

AS

09.45.800

—

09.45.880

may be cited as the Earthslide Relief Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1966)